Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.655, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Owners and occupants may take certain animals. (a) A person or the person's agent may take bats, snakes, salamanders, lizards, weasel, mink, squirrel, rabbit, hare, raccoon, bobcat, fox, opossum, muskrat, new text begin elk, new text end or beaver on land owned or occupied by the person where the animal is causing damage. The person or the person's agent may take the animal without a license and in any manner except by artificial lights in the closed season or by poison. Raccoons may be taken under this subdivision with artificial lights during open season. (b) Any traps used under this subdivision must be tagged as required under section 97B.928 if placed by an agent of the landowner or occupant. (c) A person or the person's agent who kills mink, raccoon, bobcat, fox, opossum, muskrat, new text begin elk, new text end or beaver under this subdivision must notify a conservation officer or employee of the Fish and Wildlife Division within 24 hours after the animal is killed. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.655, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Special permit for taking protected wild animals. (a) The commissioner may issue special permits under section 97A.401, subdivision 5, to take protected wild animals that are damaging property or to remove or destroy their dens, nests, or houses.new text begin Notwithstanding section 97A.401, a permit is not required to take elk under subdivision 1.new text end (b) Removing or destroying a beaver dam associated with beavers causing damage must be according to section 97B.665.